tests/ky-jnw.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../tr-ky.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../ky-tr.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "[twol] Yotification":
    кой<v><tv><prt_perf> : коюп
    кой<v><tv><ger><nom> : коюу
    кой<v><tv><prt_impf> : коё
    тий<v><tv><prt_impf> : тие
    жай<v><tv><prt_impf> : жая
    саба<v><tv><prt_impf> : сабай
    боё<v><tv><prt_impf> : боёй
    бой<n><px3sg><nom> : бою
    бой<n><px3sg><acc> : боюн

  "[twol] м and п stuff":
    тап<v><tv><prt_perf> : таап
    өп<v><tv><prt_perf> : өөп
    теп<v><tv><prt_perf> : тээп
    там<v><iv><prt_perf> : таамп
    эм<v><iv><prt_perf> : ээмп
    саба<v><tv><prt_perf> : сабап

  "[twol] {I}{l} passives":
    тап<v><tv><pass><ger><nom> : табылуу
    саба<v><tv><pass><ger><nom> : сабалуу
    бил<v><tv><pass><ger><nom> : билинүү
    талкала<v><tv><pass><ger><nom> : талкалануу

  "[lexc] Infinitive -{U}{U}":
    айт<v><iv><ger><nom> : айтуу
    тарт<v><tv><ger><nom> : тартуу
    бол<v><iv><ger><nom> : болуу
    сүй<v><tv><ger><nom> : сүйүү
    окшо<v><iv><ger><nom> : окшоо
    иште<v><iv><ger><nom> : иштөө
    саба<v><tv><ger><nom> : сабоо
    аарчы<v><tv><ger><nom> : аарчуу
    аарчы<v><iv><ger><nom> : аарчуу
    шиши<v><iv><ger><nom> : шишүү
    ат<v><tv><ger><nom> : атуу
    кет<v><iv><ger><nom> : кетүү
    боё<v><tv><ger><nom> : боёо

  "[twol] {I} deletion":
    бол<v><iv><prt_perf> : болуп
    айт<v><iv><prt_perf> : айтып
    айт<v><tv><prt_perf> : айтып
    жет<v><iv><prt_perf> : жетип
    сүй<v><tv><prt_perf> : сүйүп
    иште<v><iv><prt_perf> : иштеп
    саба<v><tv><prt_perf> : сабап

  "[twol] random vociing stuff":
    чык<v><iv><prt_perf> : чыгып
    чык<v><iv><prt_impf> : чыга
    тап<v><tv><prt_impf> : таба
    теп<v><tv><prt_impf> : тебе
